Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. Subject to the restrictions of this 3 subsection, subtract the sum of the following amounts: 4 (1) The amount of contributions made by an account holder 5 during the tax year to the account holderâs catastrophic 6 savings account under chapter 541C, not to exceed the following 7 aggregate lifetime limits: 8 (a) For account holders whose annual homeownerâs property 9 and casualty insurance policy premium paid during the tax year 10 is less than one thousand dollars, an amount not to exceed two 11 thousand dollars. 12 (b) For account holders whose annual homeownerâs property 13 and casualty insurance policy premium during the tax year is 14 equal to or exceeds one thousand dollars, an amount not to 15 exceed the lesser of the following: 16 (i) Fifteen thousand dollars. 17 (ii) Twice the annual homeownerâs property and casualty 18 insurance policy premium paid during the tax year. 19 (c) For account holders who are self-insured, or choose not 20 to obtain a homeownerâs property and casualty insurance policy, 21 or are unable to obtain a homeownerâs property and casualty 22 insurance policy, an amount not exceeding three hundred fifty 23 thousand dollars, or the assessed value of the home, whichever 24 is less. 25 (2) To the extent included, income from interest received 26 from the account holderâs catastrophic savings account. 27 b. (1) The subtraction in paragraph âaâ shall not be 28 allowed if funds are withdrawn from an account holderâs 29 catastrophic savings account and used for purposes other than 30 as allowed in this subsection or chapter 541C. 31 (2) Add, to the extent previously deducted under paragraph 32 âaâ , the amount withdrawn during the tax year from an 33 account holderâs catastrophic savings account in excess of 34 an authorized payment for qualified catastrophic expenses 35 -1- LSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh 1/ 10 H.F. _____ authorized in section 541C.3. 1 (3) If an account holder dies, the amount of money in the 2 catastrophic savings account shall be included in the taxable 3 income of the person who receives the account, unless that 4 person is the surviving spouse of the account holder. Upon 5 the death of the surviving spouse, the amount of money in 6 the account shall be included in the taxable income of the 7 person who receives the account. The additional tax imposed 8 in subparagraph (5) of this paragraph does not apply to a 9 distribution from the account upon the death of the account 10 holder or the surviving spouse. 11 (4) Except for certain deaths described in subparagraph 12 (3), if an account holder sells their homestead and does 13 not purchase a new homestead within six months of the sale, 14 the account holder shall include the amount of money in the 15 catastrophic savings account as taxable income in the year the 16 homestead is sold. 17 (5) For any amount considered a withdrawal required to be 18 added to net income pursuant this paragraph, the account holder 19 shall be assessed a penalty equal to two and one-half percent 20 of the amount of the withdrawal in excess of an authorized 21 payment for qualified catastrophic expenses. The penalty 22 shall not apply to withdrawals due to the death of the account 23 holder, or to withdrawals made pursuant to a garnishment, 24 levy, or other order, including but not limited to an order in 25 bankruptcy following a filing for protection under the federal 26 bankruptcy code, 11 U.S.C. Â§101 et seq. 27 (6) For purposes of this paragraph, the transfer of amounts 28 in order to change catastrophic savings account institutions 29 by the account holder shall not cause such transfer to be 30 considered a withdrawal to be added to net income pursuant this 31 paragraph. 32 c. Add, to the extent deducted for federal tax purposes, 33 interest, taxes, and other miscellaneous expenses to the extent 34 such amounts are qualified catastrophic expenses in connection 35 -2- LSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh 2/ 10 H.F. _____ with a catastrophic loss that were paid or reimbursed from 1 funds in the catastrophic savings account. 2 d. For purposes of this subsection: 3 (1) âAccount holderâ means the same as defined in section 4 541C.2, regardless of filing status. 5 (2) âCatastrophic savings accountâ means the same as defined 6 in section 541C.2. 7 (3) âQualified catastrophic expenseâ means the same as 8 defined in section 541C.2. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 541C.1 Short title. 10 This chapter may be cited as the âCatastrophic Savings 11 Account Actâ . 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 541C.2 Definitions. 13 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 14 requires: 15 1. âAccount holderâ means an individual who is a resident 16 and who establishes, either individually or jointly with the 17 individualâs spouse, a catastrophic savings account pursuant 18 to section 541C.3. 19 2. âCatastrophic eventâ means windstorms, cyclones, 20 earthquakes, ice storms, tornadoes, high winds, flood, hail 21 and force majeure, and similar perils not normally among those 22 covered under most property casualty insurance policies, but 23 obtainable through the purchase of wind, wind and hail, flood, 24 or storm or windstorm coverage, or any combination of those 25 coverages. The term âcatastrophic eventâ also includes any 26 event for which a major disaster has been declared to exist by 27 the president of the United States or for which the governor 28 has proclaimed a state of disaster emergency. 29 3. âCatastrophic savings accountâ or âsavings accountâ means 30 an account that meets the requirements of sections 541C.3 and 31 541C.4 and that was established for the purpose of paying or 32 reimbursing a designated beneficiaryâs qualified catastrophic 33 expenses. 34 4. âDepartmentâ means the department of revenue. 35 -3- LSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh 3/ 10 H.F. _____ 5. âDesignated beneficiaryâ means an individual meeting the 1 requirements of section 541C.3, subsection 2, and designated 2 by an account holder as beneficiary of the account holderâs 3 catastrophic savings account pursuant to section 541C.3, 4 subsection 2. 5 6. âFinancial institutionâ means a state or federally 6 chartered bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or 7 trust company in this state. 8 7. âHomesteadâ means the same as defined in section 425.11. 9 8. âIndividualâ means a natural person. 10 9. âQualified catastrophic expenseâ means the payment of a 11 homeownerâs property and casualty insurance policy deductible 12 under an insurance policy covering the account holderâs 13 homestead, if the policy covers flood, windstorm, or another 14 catastrophic event, or the equivalent of such payments by an 15 uninsured account holder. 16 10. âResidentâ means the same as defined in section 422.4. 17 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 541C.3 Catastrophic savings account. 18 1. a. Beginning January 1, 2026, an individual may open an 19 interest-bearing savings account with a financial institution 20 and designate the entire account as a catastrophic savings 21 account for the purpose of paying qualified catastrophic 22 expenses. The savings account designation shall be made 23 no later than April 30 of the year following the tax year 24 during which the account is opened, on forms provided by the 25 department. 26 b. An account holder shall not establish more than one 27 savings account. 28 2. a. The account holder shall designate one individual 29 as beneficiary of the savings account. The designation shall 30 be made on forms provided by the department and no later than 31 April 30 of the year following the tax year during which 32 the account is opened. The account holder may change the 33 designated beneficiary of the savings account at any time. 34 b. The account holder and designated beneficiary of a 35 -4- LSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh 4/ 10 H.F. _____ savings account may be the same individual. 1 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 541C.4 Account administration ââ 2 account holder responsibilities. 3 1. a. Contributions to an account may be made by any person 4 in the form of cash. The aggregate lifetime contribution 5 limitations that may be made to a savings account are as 6 follows: 7 (1) For account holders whose annual homeownerâs property 8 and casualty insurance policy premium paid during the tax year 9 is less than one thousand dollars, an amount not to exceed two 10 thousand dollars. 11 (2) For account holders whose annual homeownerâs property 12 and casualty insurance policy premium during the tax year is 13 equal to or exceeds one thousand dollars, an amount not to 14 exceed the lesser of the following: 15 (a) Fifteen thousand dollars. 16 (b) (b) Twice the annual homeownerâs property and casualty 17 insurance policy premium paid during the tax year. 18 (3) For account holders who are self-insured, or choose not 19 to obtain a homeownerâs property and casualty insurance policy, 20 or are unable to a obtain homeownerâs property and casualty 21 insurance policy, an amount not exceeding three hundred fifty 22 thousand dollars, or the assessed value of the home, whichever 23 is less. 24 b. Interest accrued in the savings account shall not be 25 counted for purposes of calculating the aggregate lifetime 26 contribution limitations. 27 c. The aggregate lifetime contribution limitations of an 28 account holder may increase if an account holderâs homeownerâs 29 property and casualty homeownerâs insurance policy premium 30 increases as provided in paragraph âaâ , but once an aggregate 31 lifetime limitation is achieved in paragraph âaâ the aggregate 32 lifetime limitation is not required to decrease. 33 2. The account holder shall not use funds held in a savings 34 account to pay expenses, if any, of administering the account, 35 -5- LSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh 5/ 10 H.F. _____ except that all fees and charges assessed by the financial 1 institution may be deducted from the account by the financial 2 institution where the account is held. 3 3. The account holder shall submit the following 4 information to the department: 5 a. An annual report for the savings account on forms 6 furnished by the department. The report shall be included with 7 the Iowa income tax return of the account holder. 8 b. A copy of the federal internal revenue service form 9 1099, or other similar federal internal revenue service income 10 reporting form, if any, issued for the savings account to the 11 account holder by the financial institution where the account 12 is held. The form shall be included with the Iowa income tax 13 return of the account holder. 14 c. Upon a withdrawal of funds from a catastrophic savings 15 account, a transaction report on forms furnished by the 16 department. 17 4. The account holder may withdraw funds from a savings 18 account at any time. 19 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 541C.5 Financial institution 20 protections. 21 This chapter shall not be construed to require a financial 22 institution to do any of the following, or to be responsible or 23 liable for any of the following: 24 1. Designate or label within the financial institutionâs 25 account contracts, systems, or in any other manner, an account 26 as a savings account. 27 2. Ascertain or verify the purpose of a withdrawal of funds 28 from a savings account, or track the destination or use of the 29 withdrawn funds. 30 3. Allocate funds in a savings account to a designated 31 beneficiary or among joint account holders. 32 4. Report any information to the department or any other 33 governmental agency. 34 5. Determine or ensure that an account satisfies the 35 -6- LSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh 6/ 10 H.F. _____ requirements to be a savings account. 1 6. Determine or ensure that funds withdrawn from a savings 2 account are used for the payment of qualified catastrophic 3 expenses. 4 7. Report or remit taxes or penalties related to the 5 ownership or use of a savings account. 6 8. Include the name of a beneficiary in the title of a 7 savings account, or document the change of any beneficiary to 8 a savings account. 9 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 541C.6 Tax considerations. 10 The state income tax treatment of a savings account shall be 11 as provided in section 422.7, subsection 45. 12 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 541C.7 Rules and forms. 13 1. The department shall adopt rules to implement and 14 administer this chapter. 15 2. The department shall create and make available forms 16 to be used in complying with this chapter, including but not 17 limited to the following: 18 a. A form for designating an account as a savings account 19 pursuant to section 541C.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 20 b. A form for designating an individual as beneficiary of 21 a savings account pursuant to section 541C.3, subsection 2, 22 paragraph âaâ . 23 c. A savings account annual report as required in section 24 541C.4, subsection 3, paragraph âaâ . The report shall require, 25 at a minimum, a list of transactions occurring on the account 26 during the tax year, and shall identify any supporting 27 documentation to be included with the report or maintained by 28 the taxpayer. 29 d. A transaction report as required in section 541C.4, 30 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ , which report shall require, at a 31 minimum, information regarding the eligible home costs to which 32 any withdrawn funds were applied in connection with a qualified 33 home purchase, and information regarding the amount of funds 34 remaining, if any, in a catastrophic savings account. 35 -7- LSB 1949YC (3) 91 jm/jh 7/ 10 H.F. _____ Sec. 9. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 1 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 2